Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 13 Judicial Council

8-13-1.
Creation — Composition.

A judicial council is hereby created for the study of the organization of the judicial system of the state and all matters relating to the administration of the system and its several departments of service. The judicial council shall consist of six (6) members of the bar of this state, who shall be appointed by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 699, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-13-1

.

8-13-2.
Appointment of members — Vacancies.

In the month of January in each year, the governor shall appoint two (2) persons, qualified as provided in §

8-13-1

, to succeed the members of the council whose offices shall next expire, to hold office for three (3) years and until their respective successors shall be appointed and qualified. Any vacancy that shall occur in the membership of the council shall be filled by another appointment by the governor for the remainder of the term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 699, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-13-2

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 11.

8-13-3.
Officers of council.

The members of the council shall annually choose from their own membership a chairperson and a secretary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 699, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-13-3

.

8-13-4.
Powers and duties.

The judicial council may from time to time submit for the consideration of the justices of the various courts such suggestions in regard to the judicial system of the state as it may deem advisable, and it shall report annually to the governor on or before December the fifteenth upon such matters as it desires to bring to his or her attention or to the attention of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 699, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-13-4

.

8-13-5.
Compensation of secretary — Expenses of council.

The secretary of the council shall receive annually the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) as compensation for his or her services and the other members of the council shall serve without compensation but shall be allowed their necessary travel, clerical, and other expenses, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum, or so much thereof as may from time to time be required, upon the receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the chairperson of the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 699, § 3; P.L. 1952, ch. 2993, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-13-5

.